Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 5
SAFE DEPOSIT AND SAFEKEEPING FACILITIES

11-105-501. Safe deposit boxes - leasing and subsidiary company.

Subject to such rules as the banking board may prescribe, a bank may maintain and lease safe deposit boxes and may accept property for safekeeping if, except in the case of night depositories, it issues a receipt therefor.

A bank may own stock in a safe deposit company located in the same community in which the bank is doing business, not exceeding in aggregate cost fifteen percent of its capital and surplus, but at least ninety percent of the stock in such safe deposit company in which such stock is so owned must be owned by banks or trust companies.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1126, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 689, § 8, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-502. Access by fiduciaries.

Where a safe deposit box is made available by a lessor to one or more persons acting as fiduciaries, the lessor may, except as otherwise expressly provided in the lease or the writings pursuant to which such fiduciaries are acting, allow access thereto as follows:

By any one or more of the persons acting as executors or administrators;

By any one or more of the persons otherwise acting as fiduciaries, when authorized in writing, signed by all other persons so acting;

By any agent authorized in writing, signed by all of the persons acting as fiduciaries.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1126, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-503. Lease to minor.

A lessor may lease a safe deposit box to, or accept property for safekeeping from, a minor and, in connection therewith, deal with such minor to the same effect as if dealing with a person of full legal capacity, unless and until the minor's guardian or conservator files with the lessor a certified copy of the order of a Colorado court having jurisdiction appointing such guardian or conservator and directs otherwise.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1126, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-504. Death of lessee - procedure.

The provisions of section 15-10-111, C.R.S., shall apply on the death of a lessee of a safe deposit box as defined in section 11-101-401.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-505. Adverse claims to safe deposit box.

An adverse claim to the contents of a safe deposit box is not sufficient reason to require the lessor to deny access to its lessee unless:

The lessor is directed to do so by a court order issued in an action in which the lessee is served with process and named as a party by a name that identifies the lessee with the name in which the safe deposit box is leased; or

The safe deposit box is leased, or the property is held, in the name of a lessee with the addition of words indicating that the contents, or property, are held in a fiduciary capacity for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries, and the adverse claim is supported by a sworn written statement of facts disclosing that it is made by, or on behalf of, such a beneficiary and that there is reason to know that the fiduciary may misappropriate the trust property.

A claim is also an adverse claim where one of several lessees claims, contrary to the terms of the lease, an exclusive right of access, or where one or more persons claim a right of access as agents or officers of a lessee to the exclusion of others as agents or officers, or where it is claimed that a lessee is the same person as one using another name.

The lessor of a safe deposit box shall not be deemed to be in possession or control of the contents thereof for the purposes of section 13-54.5-103, C.R.S., or any other statute or rule pertaining to writs of garnishment.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) added, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 689, § 9, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-506. Annual fees.

Every lessor, except a bank as defined in section 11-101-401 (5) or subsidiary thereof, shall pay annually to the division of banking such fees as are determined by the banking board to be sufficient to defray the cost to the state of regulating such lessor.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-9-107 as it existed prior to 2003.